Illinois, session 104th, HB4111.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 25 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 167/25 new)7    Sec. 25. Student withdrawal policies and reimbursement. 8    (a) In this Section, "extenuating circumstances" includes, 9but is not limited to, illness, injury, hospitalization, and 10mental health and wellness.11    (b) Each public institution of higher education shall 12adopt a policy that authorizes a student to withdraw from the 13public institution of higher education under extenuating 14circumstances. Withdrawal policies developed under this 15Section shall include a provision to refund a student for 16tuition and fees and room and board costs paid by the student 17or the student's family, to be prorated, for the semester 18during which the student withdraws if extenuating 19circumstances inhibit the student's ability to complete the 20student's education at the public institution of higher 21education. 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   HB4111- 2 -LRB104 14494 LNS 27634 b11, 2027.